Washington statutes.
RCW 15.30.210

Unlawful sales, acts, or use of words "controlled atmosphere storage" and terms of similar import.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sell, offer for sale, hold for sale, or transport for sale any fruits or vegetables represented as having been exposed to "controlled atmosphere storage" or to use any such term or form of words or symbols of similar import unless such fruits or vegetables have been stored in controlled atmosphere storage which meets the requirements of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder.

[ 1961 c 29 s 21.]